it: Zona del viso: Occhi; Viso; Collo; Altro
cs: Oblast obličeje: Oči; Obličej; Krk; Jiné
en: Face area: Eyes; Face; Neck; Other
pt-PT: Área do rosto: Olhos; Rosto; Pescoço; Outro
zh-TW: 臉部: 眼睛; 臉; 脖子; 其他
pt-BR: Área do rosto: Olhos; Rosto; Pescoço; Outro
hr-HR: Područje lica: Oči; Lice; Vrat; Ostalo
tr: Yüz alanı: Gözler; Yüz; Boyun; Diğer
th: บริเวณใบหน้า: ดวงตา; ใบหน้า; คอ; อื่นๆ
bg-BG: Област на лицето: Очи; Лице; Врат; Други
zh-CN: 面部区域: 眼睛; 面部; 颈项; 其他
el: Περιοχή προσώπου: Μάτια; Πρόσωπο; Λαιμός; Άλλο
ro-RO: Zona feței: Ochi; Față; Gât; Altele
ko: 얼굴 부위: 눈; 얼굴; 목; 기타
sv: Ansiktsområde: Ögon; Ansikte; Nacke; Övrigt
da: Ansigtsområde: Øjne; Ansigt; Nakke; Andet
hu: Arc területe: Szem; Arc; Nyak; Egyéb
fi: Kasvoalue: Silmät; Kasvot; Niska; Muu
ja: 面領域: 目; 顔; 首; その他
ru: Зона лица: Глаза; Лицо; Шея; Другой
fr: Zone du visage: Yeux; Visage; Cou; Autre
nb: Ansiktsområde: Øyne; Ansikt; Hals; Annet
lt-LT: Veido sritis: Akys; Veidas; Kaklas; Kita
de: Gesichtsbereich: Augen; Gesicht; Hals; Sonstiges
vi: Vùng khuôn mặt: Mắt; Khuôn mặt; Cổ; Khác
pl: Obszar twarzy: Oczy; Twarz; Szyja; Inne
sl-SI: Področje obraza: Oči; Obraz; Vrat; Drugo
sk-SK: Oblasť tváre: Oči; Tvár; Krk; Iné
nl: Gezichtsgebied: Ogen; Gezicht; Nek; Andere
es: Área de la cara: Ojos; Rostro; Cuello; Otros